tests/clitics.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
      App: hfst-lookup
      Gen: ../tyv.autogen.hfst
      Morph: ../tyv.automorf.hfst

Tests:

 "Interrogative / deictic -{i}л":
   чүве<n><nom>+ыл<qst> : чүвел
   каш<adv><itg>+ыл<qst> : кажыл
   тур<v><iv><ger_aor><nom>+ыл<qst> : турарыл
   чуртта<v><iv><ger_aor><nom>+ыл<qst> : чурттаарыл
   соок<n><nom>+ыл<qst> : соогул
   кандыг<prn><itg><nom>+ыл<qst> : кандыгыл

 "Copula clitic -{D}{I}р":
   ээлдек<adj>+э<cop><aor><evid><p3><sg> : ээлдек-тир
